Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1872.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 25COOPERATION WITH FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIESSec.2501. Scope of chapter.2502. Agreements with Federal immigration authorities.2503. Construction.§ 2501. Scope of chapter. This chapter relates to agreements between the Pennsylvania State Police and Federal immigration authorities.§ 2502. Agreements with Federal immigration authorities. (a) Prohibition.-- The Pennsylvania State Police may not 12345678910111213141516171819 enter into, modify, renew or extend an agreement that does any of the following:(1) Authorizes the exercise of Federal civil immigration authority under 8 U.S.C. § 1357 (relating to powers of immigration officers and employees).(2) Provides for the detention or housing of an individual held by a Federal immigration authority for a civil violation of Federal immigration law, including an intergovernmental service agreement under 8 U.S.C. § 1103(a)(11) (relating to powers and duties of the Secretary, the Under Secretary, and the Attorney General).(b) Termination of existing agreements.-- The Pennsylvania State Police shall terminate an agreement specified under subsection (a) that is in effect on the effective date of this subsection within 30 days after the effective date of this subsection.§ 2503. Construction. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to:(1) limit a law enforcement agency from enforcing a valid warrant or order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction; or(2) prohibit a law enforcement agency from complying with a Federal statute or regulation governing the disclosure of criminal history record information, including 28 CFR Pt. 20 (relating to criminal justice information systems).Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1872PN2324 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526